dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
SFX xQ íxer ixarai díxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xQ íxer ixarave díxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ íxer ixarae díxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ íxer ixarave díxer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ íxer ixarae díxer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxaría dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa
SFX xQ úxer uxarea dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa, veronexe
SFX xQ úxer uxarésimo/I2 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]simo
SFX xQ úxer uxarísino/I2 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]simo, pavan
SFX xQ úxer uxarísimo/I2 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]simo, paduan
SFX xQ úxer uxaríimo/I2 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]simo, triestin
SFX xQ úxer uxaría/I3 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xQ úxer uxarías/I3 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xQ úxer uxarisi/I3 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rísi, paduan, arkade
SFX xQ úxer uxarísis/I3 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rísi, paduan, arkade
SFX xQ úxer uxaresi/I4 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rési
SFX xQ úxer uxarisi/I4 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rísi, paduan, arkade
SFX xQ úxer uxarié/I4 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX xQ úxer uxarisié/I4 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX xQ úxer uxaría dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa
SFX xQ úxer uxarea dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa, veronexe
SFX xQ úxer uxarave/I1 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxarae dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxaravi/I1 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xQ úxer uxarai dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xQ úxer uxarave dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxarae dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxarave/I3 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxaràves/I3 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], pavan
SFX xQ úxer uxarae dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxaravi/I3 dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xQ úxer uxarai dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xQ úxer uxarave dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxarae dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxarave dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xQ úxer uxarae dúxer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
