dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
díxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ@0-1+0^4^7^2.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
dixerò/T0T1T2T3T6N0N1N2N3N4N6L1L2L3L5l1l2l3l5W3w3xQ@0-1+0^4^7^2.0	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular st:díxer
antedíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:ante
benedíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:ben
dixdíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:des
interdíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:inter
intardíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:inter
intradíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:intra
intredíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:inter
maladíxer/T5T6L5W3P0P1xNxOxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:mal
maledíxer/T5T6L5W3P0P1xNxOxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:mal
soradíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:sora
dúxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ@0-1+0^2.0^1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
duxerò/T0T1T2T3T6N0N1N2N3N4N6L1L2L3L5l1l2l3l5W3w3xQ@0-1+0^2.0^1	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular st:dúxer
dedúxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ^2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:de
endúxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:in
kondúxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:kon
introdúxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:intro
prodúxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:pro
sedúxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:se
